nb: Grepvoksform: Grepsteip; Hard voks; Klister; Flytende; Pasta; Pulver; Fast stift; Spray; Universell grepsteip; Annet
it: Forma in cera per impugnature: Nastro grip; Cera dura; Klister; Liquido; Pasta; Polvere; Stick solido; Spray; Nastro grip universale; Altro
zh-TW: 握把蠟形式: 防滑貼; 硬蠟; Klister 軟蠟; 液態; 膏狀; 粉末; 固體棒狀; 噴霧; 通用防滑貼; 其他
cs: Vosková forma na uchopení: Omotávka; Tvrdý vosk; Klistr; Tekutý; Pasta; Prášek; Tuhá tyčinka; Sprej; Univerzální omotávka; Ostatní
tr: Kavrama mumu kalıbı: Tutuş bandı; Sert mum; Klister; Sıvı; Macun; Toz; Katı çubuk; Sprey; Evrensel tutuş bandı; Diğer
ru: Форма воска для хвата: Лента держания; Твердая мазь; Клистер; Жидкая мазь; Паста; Порошок; Твердый стик; Спрей; Универсальная лента держания; Другое
th: รูปแบบของแว็กซ์สำหรับด้ามจับ: กริปเทป; ฮาร์ดแว็กซ์; คลีสเตอร์; แบบน้ำ; เนื้อครีม; ผง; แบบแท่ง; สเปรย์; กริปเทปอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ja: グリップワックスフォーム: グリップテープ; ハードワックス; クリスター; リキッド; ペースト; パウダー; 固形スティック; スプレー; ユニバーサルグリップテープ; その他
lt-LT: Sukibimo vaško forma: Sukibimo juosta; Kietasis vaškas; Klisteris; Skystis; Pasta; Milteliai; Kieta lazdelė; Purškiklis; Universali sukibimo juosta; Kita
sv: Greppvaxform: Grepptejp; Hårdvalla; Klister; Flytande; Pasta; Pulver; Stift; Spray; Universell grepptejp; Övrigt
da: Form af grebsvoks: Grebstape; Hård voks; Klister; Væske; Pasta; Pulver; Fast stift; Spray; Universalgrebstape; Andet
es: Forma de cera de agarre: Cinta de agarre; Cera dura; Klister; Líquido; Pasta; Polvo; Barra sólida; Aerosol; Cinta de agarre universal; Otro
sl-SI: Oblika voska za oprijem: Trak za oprijem; Trdi vosek; Klister; Tekočina; Pasta; Prah; V stiku; Pršilo; Univerzalni trak za oprijem; Drugo
de: Form des Griffwachses: Griptape; Hartwachs; Klister; Flüssig; Paste; Pulver; Fester Stift; Spray; Universal-Griptape; Sonstige
sk-SK: Forma vosku na úchop: Páska na grip; Tvrdý vosk; Klistr (klister); Tekutý; Pasta; Práškový; Tuhá tyčinka; Sprej; Univerzálna páska na grip; Iné
pt-BR: Cera para grip forma: Fita grip; Cera dura; Klister; Líquido; Pasta; Pó; Bastão sólido; Spray; Fita de aderência universal; Outro
vi: Dạng sáp bám dính: Băng dán tăng độ bám; Sáp cứng; Klister; Chất lỏng; Dạng sệt; Dạng bột; Thỏi rắn; Dạng xịt; Băng dán tăng độ bám vạn năng; Khác
hu: Tapadówax formaája: Tapadószalag; Kemény wax; Kliszter; Folyékony; Paszta; Por; Szilárd rúd; Spray; Univerzális tapadószalag; Egyéb
fi: Pitovoiteen muoto: Pitoteippi; Kovavaha; Liisteri; Neste; Tahna; Jauhe; Kiinteä puikko; Suihke; Yleispitoteippi; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на ваксата за захват: Лента за дръжка; Твърда вакса; Клистер (Klister); Течна; Паста; Прах; Твърда пръчка; Спрей; Универсална лента за дръжка; Друго
ro-RO: Formă ceară de prindere.: Bandă de prindere; Ceară tare; Klister; Lichid; Pastă; Pulbere; Baton solid; Spray; Bandă de prindere universală; Altele
nl: Gripwax vorm: Griptape; Harde wax; Klister; Vloeibaar; Pasta; Poeder; Vaste stick; Spray; Universele griptape; Overig
ko: 그립 왁스 형태: 그립 테이프; 하드 왁스; 클리스터; 액체; 페이스트; 분말; 솔리드 스틱; 스프레이; 범용 그립 테이프; 기타
pt-PT: Forma de cera de aderência: Fita de aderência; Cera dura; Klister; Líquido; Pasta; Pó; Bastão sólido; Spray; Fita de aderência universal; Outra
el: Μορφή κεριού πρόσφυσης: Ταινία λαβής; Σκληρό κερί; Klister (κλίστερ); Υγρό; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Συμπαγές στικ; Σπρέι; Ταινία λαβής γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pl: Forma wosku do chwytu: Owijka; Twardy wosk; Klistry; Płyn; Pasta; Proszek; Sztyft; Spray; Uniwersalna taśma zwiększająca przyczepność; Inne
zh-CN: 防滑蜡形态: 防滑贴; 硬蜡; Klister 软蜡; 液体; 膏状; 粉末; 固体棒; 喷雾; 通用防滑贴; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik voska za hvatanje: Grip traka; Tvrdi vosak; Klister; Tekućina; Pasta; Prah; Čvrsti štapić; Sprej; Univerzalna grip traka; Ostalo
fr: Forme de la cire d’adhérence: Bande d’adhérence; Cire dure; Klister; Liquide; Pâte; Poudre; Bâton solide; Vaporisateur; Bande d’adhérence universelle; Autre
en: Grip wax form: Grip tape; Hard wax; Klister; Liquid; Paste; Powder; Solid stick; Spray; Universal grip tape; Other